Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding chapter 94G of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, or any other general lor special law or regulation to the contrary, Host Community
Agreements entered into prior to August 11, 2022, shall not be reviewable or challenged if the
Host Impact Fees do not exceed 3% of gross sales for the first 5 years of the agreement.
of 1